Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1736.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 114D.20, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Priorities for scheduling and preparing WRAPSs and TMDLs. The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must seek recommendations from the deleted text begin Clean Water Council; thedeleted text end commissioners of natural resources, health, and agriculture; and the Board of Water and Soil Resources regarding priorities for scheduling and preparing WRAPSs and TMDLs. Recommendations must consider the causes of impairments, the designated uses of the waters, applicable federal TMDL requirements, surface water and groundwater interactions, protection of high-quality waters, waters and watersheds with declining water quality trends, and waters used as drinking water sources. Furthermore, consideration must be given to waters and watersheds: (1) that have the greatest potential risk to human health; (2) that have the greatest potential risk to threatened or endangered species; (3) that have the greatest potential risk to aquatic health; (4) where other public agencies and participating organizations and individuals, especially local, basin-wide, watershed, or regional agencies or organizations, have demonstrated readiness to assist in carrying out the responsibilities, including availability and organization of human, technical, and financial resources necessary to undertake the work; and (5) where there is demonstrated coordination and cooperation among cities, counties, watershed districts, and soil and water conservation districts in planning and implementation of activities that will assist in carrying out the responsibilities. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 114D.30, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Creation; duties. A Clean Water Council is created to deleted text begin advise on the administration and implementation of this chapter, and foster coordination and cooperation as described in section 114D.20, subdivision 1. The council may also advise on the development of appropriate processes for expert scientific review as described in section 114D.35, subdivision 2. The Pollution Control Agency shall provide administrative support for the council with the support of other member agencies. The members of the council shall elect a chair from the voting members of the council.deleted text end new text begin make recommendations to the legislature on appropriations of money from the clean water fund that are consistent with the constitution and state law. The Legislative Coordinating Commission may appoint nonpartisan staff and contract with consultants as necessary to support the functions of the council.new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 114D.30, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Membership; appointment. deleted text begin (a) The commissioners of natural resources, agriculture, health, and the Pollution Control Agency, the executive director of the Board of Water and Soil Resources, the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, and the Metropolitan Council shall each appoint one person from their respective entity to serve as a nonvoting member of the council. Two members of the house of representatives, including one member from the majority party and one member from the minority party, appointed by the speaker and two senators, including one member from the majority party and one member from the minority party, appointed according to the rules of the senate shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority as nonvoting members of the council. Members appointed under this paragraph serve as nonvoting members of the council. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) Seventeen votingdeleted text end new text begin (a) The Clean Water Council consists ofnew text end members deleted text begin of the council shall bedeleted text end appointed by the governor as follows: (1) deleted text begin two members representing statewide farm organizationsdeleted text end new text begin one member from each congressional districtnew text end ;new text begin andnew text end (2) two new text begin at-large new text end members deleted text begin representing business organizations;deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) two members representing environmental organizations; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) one member representing soil and water conservation districts; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) one member representing watershed districts; deleted text end deleted text begin (6) one member representing nonprofit organizations focused on improvement of Minnesota lakes or streams; deleted text end deleted text begin (7) two members representing organizations of county governments, one member representing the interests of rural counties and one member representing the interests of counties in the seven-county metropolitan area; deleted text end deleted text begin (8) two members representing organizations of city governments; deleted text end deleted text begin (9) one member representing township officers; deleted text end deleted text begin (10) one member representing the interests of tribal governments; deleted text end deleted text begin (11) one member representing statewide hunting organizations; and deleted text end deleted text begin (12) one member representing statewide fishing organizations. deleted text end new text begin (b) Members appointed under this section must have expertise in science, water quality, hydrology, or a related field. new text end Members appointed deleted text begin under this paragraphdeleted text end must not be registered lobbyists or legislators. deleted text begin In making appointments, the governor must attempt to provide for geographic balance.deleted text end The members of the council deleted text begin appointed by the governordeleted text end are subject to the advice and consent of the senate.new text begin The members of the council must elect a chair, vice-chair, and other officers from among the council's membership.new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 114D.30, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Terms; compensation; removal. deleted text begin The terms of members representing the state agencies and the Metropolitan Council are four years and are coterminous with the governor.deleted text end The terms of deleted text begin other nonlegislativedeleted text end members of the council deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin arenew text end as provided in section 15.059, subdivision 2. Members may serve until their successors are appointed and qualify. Compensation and removal of deleted text begin nonlegislative councildeleted text end members deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin arenew text end as provided in section 15.059, subdivisions 3 and 4, except that a deleted text begin nonlegislativedeleted text end member may be compensated at the rate of up to $125 a day. deleted text begin Compensation of legislative members is as determined by the appointing authority. The Pollution Control Agency may reimburse legislative members for expenses.deleted text end A vacancy on the council may be filled by the deleted text begin appointing authority provided in subdivision 1deleted text end new text begin governornew text end for the remainder of the unexpired term. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 114D.30, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Recommended appropriations. (a) The Clean Water Council must submit recommendations to the governor and the legislature on how money from the clean water fund should be appropriated for the purposes stated in article XI, section 15, of the Minnesota Constitution and section 114D.50. (b) The council's recommendations must: (1) be to protect, enhance, and restore water quality in lakes, rivers, and streams and to protect groundwater from degradation and ensure that at least five percent of the clean water fund is spent only to protect drinking water sources; (2) be consistent with the purposes, policies, goals, and priorities in this chapter; and (3) allocate adequate support and resources to identify degraded groundwater and impaired waters, develop TMDLs, implement restoration of groundwater and impaired waters, and provide assistance and incentives to prevent groundwater and surface waters from becoming degraded or impaired and improve the quality of surface waters which are listed as impaired but have no approved TMDL. (c) The council must recommend methods of ensuring that awards of grants, loans, or other funds from the clean water fund specify the outcomes to be achieved as a result of the funding and specify standards to hold the recipient accountable for achieving the desired outcomes. new text begin The council may recommend that a portion of its administrative budget be spent to evaluate the effectiveness of past appropriations from the clean water fund on achieving their intended goals. new text end Expenditures from the fund must be appropriated by law. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 114D.30, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Reports to legislature. By January 15 each odd-numbered year, the council must submit a report to the legislature that includes: (1) a summary of the activities for which money has been or will be spent in the current biennium; (2) the recommendations required under subdivision 6 for how money in the clean water fund should be spent in the next biennium, including recommended legislative bill language; and (3) deleted text begin the impact on economic development of the implementation of efforts to protect and restore groundwater and the impaired waters programdeleted text end new text begin the effectiveness of past appropriations from the clean water fund on achieving their intended goalsnew text end . Sec. 7. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 114D.30, subdivision 5; and 114D.35, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01295 114D.30 CLEAN WATER COUNCIL. Subd. 5. Implementation plan. The Clean Water Council shall recommend a plan for implementation of this chapter and the provisions of article XI, section 15, of the Minnesota Constitution relating to clean water. The recommended plan shall address general procedures and time frames for implementing this chapter, and shall include a more specific implementation work plan for the next fiscal biennium and a framework for setting priorities to address impaired waters consistent with section 114D.20, subdivisions 2 to 7. The council shall issue a revised plan by December 1 of each even-numbered year. 114D.35 PUBLIC AND STAKEHOLDER PARTICIPATION; SCIENTIFIC REVIEW; EDUCATION. Subd. 3. Education. The Clean Water Council must develop strategies for informing, educating, and encouraging the participation of citizens, stakeholders, and others regarding this chapter. Public agencies are responsible for implementing the strategies.